Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska31-763
Annexation of territory by a city or village; effect on certain contracts.

(1) Whenever any city or village annexes all the territory within the boundaries of any sanitary and improvement district organized under the provisions of sections 31-701 to 31-726.01 as such sections existed prior to July 19, 1996, or under sections 31-727 to 31-762, the district shall merge with the city or village and the city or village shall succeed to all the property and property rights of every kind, contracts, obligations, and choses in action of every kind, held by or belonging to the district, and the city or village shall be liable for and recognize, assume, and carry out all valid contracts and obligations of the district. All taxes, assessments, claims, and demands of every kind due or owing to the district shall be paid to and collected by the city or village. Any special assessments which the district was authorized to levy, assess, relevy, or reassess, but which were not levied, assessed, relevied, or reassessed, at the time of the merger, for improvements made by it or in the process of construction or contracted for may be levied, assessed, relevied, or reassessed by the annexing city or village to the same extent as the district may have levied or assessed but for the merger. Nothing in this section shall authorize the annexing city or village to revoke any resolution, order, or finding made by the district in regard to special benefits or increase any assessments made by the district, but such city or village shall be bound by all such findings or orders and assessments to the same extent as the district would be bound. No district so annexed shall have power to levy any special assessments after the effective date of such annexation.

(2) Any contract entered into on or after August 30, 2015, by a sanitary and improvement district for solid waste collection services shall, upon annexation of such district by a city or village, be canceled and voided.

Laws 1959, c. 130, § 1, p. 467;

Laws 1969, c. 255, § 1, p. 925;

Laws 2015, LB324, § 5;

Laws 2018, LB130, § 1.

Upon annexation of sanitary and improvement district by Omaha, in absence of fraud, Omaha was bound by all findings, orders, and assessments made by district to same extent as district. Pedersen v. Westroads, Inc., 189 Neb. 236, 202 N.W.2d 198 (1972).

This section covers the annexation by a city of all of the property within the boundaries of a sanitary and improvement district. Sanitary & Improvement Dist. v. City of Ralston, 182 Neb. 63, 152 N.W.2d 111 (1967).